New Jersey, session 221, A1775.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    No person shall sell, offer for sale, or distribute any nail polish or nail hardener containing, composed of, or made with dibutyl phthalates, toluene, or formaldehyde. 2.    Any sellor or distributor of nail polish or nail hardener that contains, is composed of, or is made with dibutyl phthalates, toluene, or formaldehyde, shall issue an immediate recall for that nail polish or nail hardener. 3.    The Director of Consumer Affairs shall issue an immediate recall for any nail polish or nail hardener that the director determines contains, is composed of, or is made with dibutyl phthalates, toluene, or formaldehyde. 4.    a.  Within 48 hours after receiving notice from the Director of Consumer Affairs, a seller, or a distributor that any nail polish or nail hardener has been recalled because it contains, is composed of, or is made with dibutyl phthalates, toluene, or formaldehyde, a retail mercantile establishment shall remove the nail polish or nail hardener from any display and make it unavailable for purchase. b.    Within 14 business days after receiving notice from the Director of Consumer Affairs, a seller, or a distributor that any nail polish or nail hardener has been recalled because it contains, is composed of, or is made with dibutyl phthalates, toluene, or formaldehyde, a retail mercantile establishment shall return all inventory of that nail polish or nail hardener to the seller or distributor from which it was obtained, at the cost of the seller or distributor. 5.    Within 60 business days after receiving nail polish or nail hardener that has been recalled because it contains, is composed of, or is made with dibutyl phthalates, toluene, or formaldehyde from a retail mercantile establishment, seller or distributor shall dispose of the nail polish or nail hardener in a manner and location designed to remove them from access by the general public, and in accordance with any applicable laws governing disposal of products containing dibutyl phthalates, toluene, or formaldehyde. 6.    A person who knowingly violates sections 1 through 5 of P.L.     , c.     (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall be guilty of an unlawful practice pursuant to P.L.1960, c.39 (C.56:8-1 et seq.). 7.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the seventh month next following the date of enactment.